Massachusetts, session 194th, H725.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 72. (a) There shall be a permanent commission on anti-racist education to consist 
of: the commissioner of elementary and secondary education or a designee; 1 member appointed 
by the Massachusetts Asian American Commission; 1 member appointed by the Latino Advisory 
Commission; 1 member appointed by the by the Massachusetts Commission on Indian Affairs; 3 
historians specializing in racism in America appointed by the commissioner of elementary and 
secondary education; 2 members appointed by the Boston branch of NAACP Empowerment 
Programs, Inc.; 1 member appointed by American Civil Liberties Union of Massachusetts, Inc.; 
1 member appointed by the Massachusetts Teachers Association; 1 member appointed by the 

of 3 11 Massachusetts Association of School Committees, Inc.; and 1 member appointed by the 
commissioner of elementary and secondary education. 
(b) Members shall serve terms of 2 years. Vacancies in the membership of the 
commission shall be filled by the original appointing authority for the balance of the unexpired 
term. 
(c) The commission shall elect from among its members a chair and vice chair and any 
other officers it deems necessary. 
(d) The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services, but 
shall be reimbursed for any usual and customary expenses incurred in the performance of their 
duties. 
(e) The commission shall develop a curriculum including, but not limited to: (i) selection 
of appropriate textbooks and selected works for schools to teach; (ii) instruction on racism in 
health to be taught in health classes; (iii) the legacy of scientific racism to be taught in science 
classes; (iv) systemic racism in literature and culture to be taught in English classes; (v) 
contradictions with the United States’ founding ideals and systemic racism and genocide in 
America, to be taught in history classes; (vi) the white genocide of Native Americans; (vii) the 
origins of slavery and white supremacist ideology in America; (viii) the Northern states’ role in 
profiting from and supporting slavery; (ix) the brutality and torture that white people inflicted 
upon black people in the antebellum South; (x) the exploitation of Native Americans and the 
taking of their lands; (xi) white terrorism in the post-reconstruction era; (xii) the apartheid 
Southern regime; (xiii) racial segregation in Northern states and white Northern racism; (xiv) 
black exclusion from federal reparations programs in the post-Civil War period; (xv) the 

of 3 33 internment of Japanese Americans and racism towards Asian people; (xvi) the evolution of the 
criminalization of black people and the 13th Amendment loophole; (xvii) support of the myths of 
white superiority and inferiority of Black, Indigenous and people of color by white scientists; 
and (xviii) the impact of racism on medicine and health. 
(f) Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, the anti-racist 
curriculum developed by the commission shall be mandatory for elementary and secondary 
public schools and charter schools to teach in the commonwealth. The commission shall select 
textbooks that reflect the subjects taught in the anti-racist curriculum and recommend such 
textbooks for purchase pursuant to section 48 of chapter 71. The commission shall approve the 
final curriculum by a majority vote.  
(g) After the curriculum is established, the commission shall meet, at a minimum, once a 
year to debate changes that may be approved by a simple majority vote. Not later than December 
31 of each year, the commission shall report its findings and activities of the preceding year, as 
well as any policy recommendations, to the governor, the clerks of the house of representatives 
and the senate and the joint committee on education.  
SECTION 2. The commission shall develop the curriculum pursuant to subsection (e) of 
section 72 of chapter 3 of the General Laws not later than 1 year after the effective date of this 
act and shall meet not less than 6 times during that year.